Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 45
SCHOOL ACCOUNTABILITY REPORT CARDS

Section.

33-4501. School accountability report card. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2017. For present related provisions, see§ 33-320.

33-4502. School district requirements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2017. For present related provisions, see§ 33-320.